Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3510
Employer; limit on liability and use of certain information.

If an employer inadvertently learns the user name, password, or other means of access to an employee's or applicant’s personal Internet account through the use of otherwise lawful technology that monitors the employer's computer network or employer-provided electronic communication devices for service quality or security purposes, the employer is not liable for obtaining the information, but the employer shall not use the information to access the employee's or applicant's personal Internet account or share the information with anyone. The employer shall delete such information as soon as practicable.

Laws 2016, LB821, § 10.